Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter  659, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 1, chapter 112,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of  land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 15,500,000
(b) Gender Neutral Facilities
and Mothers’ Rooms ......................... $ 10,000,000
(c) Capitol Mall Parking
Structure Improvements .................. $ 2,750,000
(d) Dome Building and
Yaquina Hall Improvements ........... $ 1,500,000
(e) Climate Adaptation and
Net Zero Solutions ............................ $ 2,000,000
(f) Parking Lot Improvements
and EV Charging Station
Expansions ..........................................$ 2,000,000
(g) Executive Building Interior
and Seismic Renovation ................... $ 45,000,000
(h) North Valley Complex
Infrastructure Upgrades/
Tenant Improvements ....................... $ 77,000,000
(i) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ............ $ 4,000,000
(j) State Facilities Security
and Capital Improvements .............. $ 10,000,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 1
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Ashland Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 5,373,235
(b) Corvallis Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 4,317,605
(c) Washington County
Readiness Center ............................... $ 5,300,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation ..........................................$ 6,867,101
(b) Capital Improvements ...................... $ 6,742,239
(c) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations ........................................$ 8,000,000
(d) Tillamook Dorm
Renovation ..........................................$ 10,279,899
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ...............................................$ 70,000,000
(b) Off-Net Telephone
Infrastructure ..................................... $ 3,508,206
(5) Oregon State Police:
(a) Central Point Office Expansion ..... $ 33,961,269
(b) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office .............. $ 61,982,733
(c) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ................................ $ 14,261,687
(6) Department of Transportation:
(a) Meacham Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 12,000,000
(b) South Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 16,200,000
(c) Region 3-5 Headquarters
HVAC Upgrades ................................ $ 3,800,000
(7) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ................. $ 320,000
(8) State Forestry Department:
(a) Santiam District Office
Replacement .......................................$ 2,500,000
(b) Toledo Facility
Replacement Phase II ...................... $ 1,632,842
(9) Oregon Department of
Fish and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal .............. $ 5,000,000
(10) State Parks and Recreation
Department, Capital
Improvement and Renewal .............. $ 50,000,000
(11) Oregon Health Authority:
(a) OSH Salem Well Water
Treatment Facility ............................ $ 4,492,750
(b) OSH Salem/Junction City
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 2
Automated Dispensing
Cabinets...............................................$ 3,500,000
(12) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing,
Permanent Supportive
Housing................................................$ 410,000,000
(13) Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
(a) Liquor Warehouse
Conveyor System ............................... $ 15,000,000
(b) Liquor Warehouse
Land and Building ............................ $ 130,455,048
(14) Department of Education[ :],
Oregon School for the Deaf
ADA Restrooms, Fire Alarm
System Replacement and
Windows Upgrade ..................... $ 5,500,000
[(a) Oregon School for the ]
[Deaf ADA Restrooms ...................... $ 1,024,625]
[(b) Oregon School for the ]
[Deaf Fire Alarm ]
[System Replacement ......................... $ 3,091,923]
[(c) Oregon School for the ]
[Deaf Windows Upgrade .................. $ 1,383,452]
(15) Judicial Department,
Supreme Court Building
Renovation ..........................................$ 21,700,000
(16) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ......................... $ 19,630,000
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 659, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the  acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ................. $ 3,069,187
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Camp Umatilla Barracks
[Facilities .............................................$ 8,000,000]
Facilities ................................... $ 28,243,000
(b) Camp Umatilla Guard Shack .......... $ 1,100,000
(c) Washington County
Readiness Center ............................... $ 22,700,000
SECTION 3.
 Section 3, chapter 659, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by  section 2, chapter 112,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 3
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of [ $475,905,100]
$455,905,100 is established for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds  from state bonds issued for the benefit of a public
university, pursuant to agreements between the commission and a public university.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 27, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5544 (SB 5544-A) Page 4